North Dakota statutes. TITLE 39 Motor Vehicles
CHAPTER 39-21 Equipment of Vehicles
39-21-46.
Scope and effect of equipment requirements — Penalty.

It is unlawful for any person to drive or move, or for the owner to cause or knowingly permit to be driven or moved, on any highway any vehicle or combination of vehicles which the actor knows does not contain those parts or is not at all times equipped with lamps and other equipment in proper condition and adjustment as required in this chapter, or which the actor knows is equipped in any manner in violation of this chapter, or for any person to do any act forbidden or fail to perform any act required under this chapter for which a fee or penalty for its violation is not otherwise provided.

A person who drives or moves, or any owner who causes or knowingly permits to be driven or moved upon a highway, any vehicle or combination of vehicles which that person knows is in such unsafe condition as to endanger a person is guilty of an infraction.

The superintendent of the state highway patrol shall, under chapter 28-32, adopt necessary rules concerning the safe operation of motor vehicles and when and how motor carrier audits or inspections will be conducted. The rules must duplicate or be consistent with current motor carrier safety regulations of the United States department of transportation. The superintendent of the state highway patrol may adopt the motor carrier safety regulations by reference, and any adoption must be construed to incorporate amendments as may be made from time to time. A violation of rules adopted under this subsection is a noncriminal violation. A person who fails or refuses to comply with these rules must be assessed a fee in the amount set forth in section 39-06.1-06 for each violation.

Nothing contained in this chapter may be construed to prohibit the use of additional parts and accessories on any vehicle not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter.

The provisions of this chapter with respect to equipment on vehicles do not apply to implements of husbandry, road machinery, road rollers, or farm tractors except as specifically made applicable.

The provisions of this chapter with respect to equipment required on vehicles do not apply to motorcycles or motor-driven cycles, except as specifically made applicable.

The provisions of this chapter and regulations of the department do not apply to vehicles moved solely by human power, except as specifically made applicable.

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 283, § 19; 1973, ch. 301, § 30; 1979, ch. 431, § 33; 1985, ch. 431, § 3; 1987, ch. 443, § 2; 1989, ch. 463, § 7; 2001, ch. 341, §§ 8, 9; 2003, ch. 317, § 8.

39-21-47.
Distress signals for handicapped drivers — Penalty for misuse. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 673.

39-21-48.
Crash helmets required for operators of and passengers on motorcycles. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 348, § 17.

Note.

For present provisions, see § 39-10.2-06.

39-21-49.
Number of riders on motorcycles limited. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 348, § 17.

Note.

For present provisions, see § 39-10.2-02.

39-21-50.
Slow-moving vehicles required to display identification emblem — Penalty.

All implements of husbandry, as defined in section 39-01-01, and machinery, including all road construction machinery, designed for operation at a speed of twenty-five miles [40.23 kilometers] an hour or less, must display either a triangular slow-moving vehicle emblem or a rotating or flashing amber light, as authorized for class B emergency vehicles, whenever traveling along the roadway on any county, state, federal highway, or city street in the state of North Dakota. The emblem or light must be mounted so as to be visible from a distance of not less than five hundred feet [152.4 meters] to the rear. The director shall adopt standards and specifications for the design and position of mounting the slow-moving vehicle emblem and light. The standards and specifications for slow-moving vehicle emblems referred to in this section must correlate with and, so far as possible, conform with those approved by the American society of agricultural engineers. No vehicle, other than those specified in this section, must display a slow-moving vehicle emblem, and its use on any type of stationary object is prohibited. Any person who fails or refuses to comply with the provisions of this section must be assessed a fee of twenty dollars for each offense.

Source:

S.L. 1969, ch. 360, §§ 1, 2; 1973, ch. 301, § 31; 1975, ch. 363, § 1; 1979, ch. 431, § 34.

39-21-51.
Alteration of odometers or other mileage recorders, hour meters on tachometers, or other hour recorders — Penalty.

A person may not willfully, as defined in section 12.1-02-02, alter a motor vehicle odometer or other mileage recorder, hour meter on tachometer, or other hour recorder, or offer for sale or sell a motor vehicle knowing the odometer or other mileage recorder has been altered, for the purpose of deceiving another. Violation of this section is a class C felony if the person has previously been convicted of violating this section, or if the person has violated this section with respect to more than one vehicle, and a class B misdemeanor in all other cases.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 316, § 1; 1975, ch. 106, § 444; 1985, ch. 446, § 1; 1993, ch. 381, § 2.

39-21-52.
Exemption for certain street rod motor vehicles.

The provisions of this chapter or chapter 37-12-02 of the North Dakota Administrative Code relating to bumpers, tires, and fenders do not apply to street rod motor vehicles. However, a street rod must have all equipment, in operating condition, which was specifically required by law as a condition for its sale when it was first manufactured. A street rod is a modernized motor vehicle which was manufactured before 1949 by a recognized manufacturer and which retains the general appearance and original body configuration as manufactured or a motor vehicle designed and manufactured to resemble such a motor vehicle. A street rod may have improved modifications to the body, chassis, engine, brakes, power train, steering, and suspension systems either by modifying the original equipment or replacing original parts with fabricated parts or those taken from other existing vehicles. The director may adopt rules to implement this section.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 483, § 1.

39-21-53.
Retractable axle control requirements.

For a motor vehicle manufactured after July 31, 2005, variable load suspension or retractable axles, or both, raised or lowered by air, hydraulic, or other pressure must have the lock or pressure regulator valve, or both, positioned outside the cab and inaccessible from the driver’s compartment if there is more than one variable load suspension axle or retractable axle, or a combination of each.

The control to lift and lower a retractable or variable load suspension axle may be accessible in the driver’s compartment, but also may not function as the pressure control device unless allowed by subsection 1.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 331, § 6.

39-21-54.
Requirement for steerable, castering, or pivoting axles.

A single unit vehicle or any vehicle in combination may not be equipped with more than four axles unless the additional axles are steerable, castering, or pivoting axles.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 331, § 6.

39-21-55.
Exemption from rear-end protection requirements. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 341, § 1.

39-21-56.
Definitions — Prohibition on counterfeit and nonfunctional airbag — Penalty.

As used in this section:

“Airbag” means an inflatable occupant restraint system device in a motor vehicle which is part of a supplemental restraint system.

“Counterfeit supplemental restraint system component” means a replacement supplemental restraint system component that displays a mark identical, or substantially similar to, the genuine mark of a motor vehicle manufacturer or a supplier of parts to the manufacturer of a motor vehicle without authorization from that manufacturer or supplier.

“Nonfunctional airbag” means a replacement airbag that:

Was previously deployed or damaged;

Has an electric fault that is detected by the motor vehicle’s airbag diagnostic systems when the installation procedure is completed and the motor vehicle is returned to the customer who requested the work to be performed or when ownership is intended to be transferred;

Includes a part or object, including a supplemental restraint system component, which is installed in a motor vehicle to mislead the owner or operator of the motor vehicle into believing a functional airbag has been installed; or

Is subject to the prohibitions of 49 U.S.C. 30120(j).

“Supplemental restraint system” means a passive inflatable motor vehicle crash protection system designed for use in conjunction with active restraint systems as defined in title 49, Code of Federal Regulations, part 571, section 208, which includes one or more airbags and all components required to ensure an airbag works as designed by the motor vehicle manufacturer including:

Operating as designed in the event of a crash; and

Is designed in accordance with federal motor vehicle safety standards of the specific make, model, and year of the motor vehicle in which the airbag is or will be installed.

A person may not intentionally or knowingly:

Manufacture, import, install, reinstall, distribute, sell, or offer for sale any device intended to replace a supplemental restraint system component in any motor vehicle if the device is a counterfeit supplemental restraint system component, nonfunctional airbag, or a device that does not meet the federal motor vehicle safety standards as provided under title 49, Code of Federal Regulations, part 571, section 208.

Sell, install, or reinstall in a motor vehicle, any device that causes the motor vehicle’s diagnostic systems to fail to warn when the motor vehicle is equipped with a counterfeit supplemental restraints system component or nonfunctional airbag, or when an airbag is not installed.

Subsection 2 does not prohibit a motor vehicle dealer, repair facility, manufacturer, or other entity from taking action to collect and dispose of used or recalled supplemental restraint system components in accordance with federal law.

A person that violates subsection 2 is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 332, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.